New Jersey, session 221, S1882.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.1948, c.454 (C.27:23-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    New Jersey Turnpike Authority. (A) There is hereby established in the [State] Department of Transportation a body corporate and politic, with corporate succession, to be known as the "New Jersey Turnpike Authority."  The authority is hereby constituted an instrumentality exercising public and essential governmental functions, and the exercise by the authority of the powers conferred by [this act] P.L.1948, c.454 (C.27:23-1 et seq.) in the acquisition, construction, operation, improvement, management, repair, and maintenance of transportation projects or any part thereof shall be deemed and held to be an essential governmental function of the State. (B)  The New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall consist of eight members, as follows: the Commissioner of Transportation, ex officio, or [his] the commissioners designee; five members appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, and two members appointed by the Governor, one upon recommendation of the President of the Senate and the other upon recommendation of the Speaker of the General Assembly, each of whom shall be a resident of the State and shall have been a qualified elector therein for a period of at least one year next preceding [his] the members appointment.  Of the appointed members, at least one shall be a resident of Atlantic County, Burlington County, Camden County, Cape May County, Gloucester County, Ocean County, or Salem County; at least one shall be a resident of Mercer County, Middlesex County, or Monmouth County; and at least one shall be a resident of Bergen County, Essex County, Hudson County, Union County, or Passaic County.  Each appointed member of the authority shall serve for a term of five years and until [his] the members successor is appointed and has qualified; except that of the first appointments hereunder, one shall be for a term of two years and one for a term of three years, and they shall serve until their respective successors are appointed and have qualified.  The term of each of the first appointees hereunder shall be designated by the Governor.  Each appointed member of the authority may be removed from office by the Governor, for cause, after a public hearing.  Each member of the authority before entering upon [his] the members duties shall take and subscribe an oath to perform the duties of [his] the members office faithfully, impartially, and justly to the best of [his] the members ability.  A record of [such] the oaths shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.  Any vacancies in the appointed membership of the authority occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment, but for the unexpired term only. (C)  The Governor shall designate one of the members of the authority as chairman thereof and another member as vice chairman thereof. The chairman and vice chairman of the authority so designated shall serve as such at the pleasure of the Governor and until their respective successors have been designated.  The authority shall elect a secretary and a treasurer who need not be members.  At the option of the authority the same person may be elected to serve both as secretary and treasurer.  Five members of the authority shall constitute a quorum and the vote of five members shall be necessary for any action taken by the authority. No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority. (D)  Each member of the authority shall execute a surety bond in the penal sum of [$25,000.00] $25,000 and the treasurer shall execute a surety bond in the penal sum of [$50,000.00] $50,000, each such surety bond to be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the office of such member or treasurer, as the case may be, to be executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in the State of New Jersey as surety and to be approved by the Attorney General and filed in the office of the Secretary of State. (E)  The members of the authority shall not receive compensation for their services as members of the authority.  Each member shall be reimbursed by the authority for [his] the members actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of [his] the members duties.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, no member shall be deemed to have forfeited, nor shall the member forfeit, the member's office or employment or any benefits or emoluments thereof by reason of the member's acceptance of the office of ex officio member of the authority or the member's services therein. (F)   No resolution or other action of the authority providing for the issuance of bonds, refunding bonds, or other obligations or for the fixing, revising, or adjusting of tolls for the use of any transportation project or parts or sections thereof shall be adopted or otherwise made effective by the authority without the prior approval in writing of the Governor and at least one of the following: the State Treasurer and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury.  A true copy of the minutes of every meeting of the authority shall be forthwith delivered by and under the certification of the secretary thereof, to the Governor.  No action taken at [such] a meeting [by] of the authority shall have force or effect until 10 days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and public holidays, after [such] a copy of the minutes shall have been so delivered.  If, in [said] that 10-day period, the Governor returns [such] the copy of the minutes with veto of any action taken by the authority or any member thereof at [such] the meeting [such] the action shall be null and of no effect.  The Governor may approve all or part of the action taken at [such] the meeting prior to [said] that 10-day period.  The powers conferred in this subsection [(F)] upon the Governor, the State Treasurer, and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury shall be exercised with due regard for the rights of the holders of bonds of the authority at any time outstanding, and nothing in, or done pursuant to, this subsection [(F)] shall in any way limit, restrict, or alter the obligation or powers of the authority or any representative or officer of the authority to carry out and perform in every detail each and every covenant, agreement, or contract at any time made or entered into by or on behalf of the authority with respect to its bonds or for the benefit, protection, or security of the holders thereof. (G)  The ex officio member of the authority may designate an employee of [his] the ex officio members department to represent [him] the member at meetings of the authority. A designee may lawfully vote and otherwise act on behalf of the member for whom [he] the member constitutes the designee. The designations shall be in writing and delivered to the authority and shall be effective until revoked or amended by a writing delivered to the authority. (cf: P.L.2003, c.79, s.6) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to members of the authority appointed on or after the effective date of this act.